New York, session 2025-2026, A9525.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 122-b of the general municipal law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 7 to read as follows: 3 7. Emergency medical services provided for pursuant to subdivision one 4 of this section shall be deemed essential services for the purposes of 5 applying for and receiving state aid. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01841-03-6